Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REDUCTION IN APPROPRIATIONS FOR UNFILLED POSITIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Reduction required. new text end new text begin The general fund and nongeneral fund appropriations to an agency for agency operations for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, are reduced by the amount of salary and benefits savings that result from any positions that have not been filled within 12 months of the posting of the position. This section applies only to positions that are posted in fiscal years 2025, 2026, and 2027. Reductions made under this paragraph must be reflected as reductions in agency base budgets for fiscal years 2028 and 2029. This section does not apply to any positions that require law enforcement training. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin The commissioner of management and budget must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the Finance Committee in the senate and the Ways and Means Committee in the house of representatives regarding the amount of reductions in spending by each agency under this section. new text end